Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
CLASSIFICATION OF MUNICIPALITIES

31-1-201. Classification of municipalities.

With respect to the exercise of corporate and municipal powers, the municipalities of this state are divided into the following classifications:

Cities or towns incorporated prior to July 3, 1877, which have retained such organization;

Cities or towns organized pursuant to the provisions of article XX of the state constitution;

Cities and towns organized pursuant to the provisions of this title or of any other general law on or after July 3, 1877, which have not chosen to adopt a home rule charter under the provisions of article XX of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1006, § 1, effective July 1.

31-1-202. Cities or towns retaining prior status.

Every city or town incorporated prior to July 3, 1877, which chooses to retain such organization, in the enforcement of the powers or the exercise of the duties conferred by the special charter or general law under which the same is incorporated, shall proceed in all respects as provided by such special charter or general law and shall not be affected nor the powers or duties thereof in any manner changed or abridged by any provisions of this title.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1006, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-1-101 and 31-1-102 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-1-203. Classification of statutory cities and towns.

With respect to the exercises of certain municipal and corporate powers, granted by the provisions of this title, and to the duties of certain municipal officers, set forth in this title, all municipal corporations organized pursuant to the provisions of this title or of any other general law on or after July 3, 1877, which have not chosen to adopt a home rule charter under the provisions of article XX of the state constitution, are divided into cities and towns.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1006, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2) repealed, p. 1492, § 9, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-1-201 and 31-1-202 as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables at the back of the index.

31-1-204. Change of classification - towns - notice - effect on officeholders - options prior to reorganization - terms of office - election dates.

The governor and secretary of state, within six months after the returns of any United States census have been filed in the office of the secretary of state, or within thirty days after the returns of the enumeration of the inhabitants of any town taken under and by authority of any town ordinance or resolution adopted by the board of trustees of such town have been filed in the office of the secretary of state, shall ascertain which towns are entitled to become cities. The governor shall cause a statement thereof to be prepared by the secretary of state, which statement shall be published in some newspaper published at the state capital and also in some newspaper, if there is one, printed in each of the towns entitled to such change in classification. A copy of such statement shall be transmitted by the secretary of state to the mayors of said towns and to the next general assembly.

Every such town may proceed at any subsequent regular town election held not sooner than ninety days after the date of the statement's receipt by the mayor, to organize according to the new classification available to it by the election of officers properly belonging thereto. No change of classification, nor the organization of the town into a city in accordance with this section, shall cause the removal from office of any member of the governing body of such town whose term of office has not expired.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 31-4-105 and 31-4-107 (4), prior to any election to reorganize to a statutory city under part 1 of article 4 of this title, the governing body of the town may adopt an ordinance providing for the continued appointment of the clerk and treasurer by the governing body. If such an ordinance is repealed, the clerk and treasurer positions shall then be elective offices until changed pursuant to section 31-4-107 (4).

Notwithstanding the provisions of part 2 of article 4 of this title, prior to any election to reorganize, the governing body may conduct an election under the provisions of part 2 of article 4 of this title to determine whether the town should reorganize directly into a city council-city manager form of government. If the voters vote to reorganize in such a manner, the town's form of government shall remain unchanged until the reorganization election at which time the town shall reorganize into a city council-city manager form of government. For the purpose of section 31-4-204 (1), laws of the state applicable to cities and not inconsistent with this part 2 or with part 2 of article 4 of this title shall apply to and govern the town after its reorganization into a city council-city manager form of government.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 31-4-104, 31-4-105, 31-4-106, and 31-4-205, prior to any reorganization election, the governing body of the town may adopt an ordinance establishing the number of members to be on the city council after reorganization, which number shall not be less than six, and providing that all members shall be elected from the city at large. If such an ordinance is repealed, the members of the council shall be elected according to the provisions of part 1 or part 2 of article 4 of this title, whichever is applicable.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 31-4-105 and 31-4-205 (1), if four-year overlapping terms for the mayor and trustees or any other elective officer were established prior to the reorganization election, such terms shall continue after reorganization for the mayor and council members and any other elective city office until changed pursuant to section 31-4-107 (3) or 31-4-205 (3).

In conformity with the provisions of section 31-1-101 (10), the regular election date for towns reorganizing into cities shall remain, after reorganization, the first Tuesday of April in each even-numbered year unless a majority of the registered electors of the city voting on the question have voted to hold the regular election of the city on a different date pursuant to section 31-10-109 (1), in which case the regular election date of the city shall mean, for such city, the date on which the regular election of officers takes place as determined by the registered electors of the city. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 31-10-109 (1), after reorganization, the governing body of the city may by ordinance establish its regular election date on the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of November in each odd-numbered year, and may include in such ordinance any alteration in the term of office of officials subsequently elected which may be necessary to accomplish the change in election dates in an orderly manner. In no event shall such ordinance shorten the term of any elected official in office at the time of its adoption.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1007, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2) amended and (3) to (7) added, p. 1489, § 2, June 5.

L. 86:

(7) amended, p. 1220, § 29, effective May 30.

L. 2004:

(7) amended, p. 809, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-203 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-1-205. Organization after change.

As soon as the statement is published, as provided in section 31-1-204, showing that any town is entitled to be organized into a city, the proper authorities of such town may adopt and publish such ordinances as may be necessary to perfect such organization with respect to the election, duties, and compensation of officers and with respect to all other necessary matters. All previously adopted ordinances of any town shall remain in force after its organization as a city so far as such ordinances may be applicable.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1007, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1490, § 3, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-204 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-1-206. Change in classification - cities - notice - effect on officeholders - terms of office - election dates.

The governor and the secretary of state, within six months after the returns of any United States census have been filed in the office of the secretary of state, or within thirty days after the returns of the enumeration of the inhabitants of any city taken under and by virtue of any city ordinance or resolution adopted by the city council have been filed in the office of the secretary of state, shall ascertain whether such city has a population of two thousand or less. If it appears that a city is entitled to change its classification to that of a town, the governor shall cause a statement thereof to be prepared by the secretary of state, which statement shall be published in some newspaper published at the state capital and also in some newspaper, if there is one, printed in the city involved.

A copy of such statement shall be transmitted by the secretary of state to the mayor of said city and to the next general assembly; and every such city, at any subsequent city regular election held not sooner than ninety days after the date of the statement's receipt by the mayor, may proceed to organize according to the new classification available to it by the election of officers properly belonging thereto. No change of classification, nor the organization of the city into a town in accordance with this section and section 31-1-207, shall cause the removal from office of any member of the governing body of such city whose term of office has not expired; all such members shall continue to be members of the governing body of the newly classified town for their respective terms of office.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 31-4-301 (2) and (5), if four-year overlapping terms for the mayor and council members or any other elective officer were established prior to the reorganization election, such terms shall continue after reorganization for the mayor and trustees and any other elective town office until changed pursuant to section 31-4-301 (5).

In conformity with the provisions of section 31-1-101 (10), the regular election date for cities reorganizing into towns shall remain, after reorganization as a town, the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of November in each odd-numbered year unless a majority of the registered electors of the town voting on the question have voted to hold the regular election of the town on a different date pursuant to section 31-10-109 (1), in which case the regular election date of the city shall mean, for any particular municipality, the date on which the regular election of officers takes place as determined by the registered electors of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1007, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) and (2) amended and (3) and (4) added, p. 1490, §§ 4, 5, effective June 5.

L. 86:

(4) amended, p. 1221, § 30, effective May 30.

L. 2004:

(4) amended, p. 809, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-205 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-1-207. Ordinances to reorganize - existing ordinances.

As soon as the statement is published, as provided in section 31-1-206, showing that any city may change in classification to a town, the governing body of such city may adopt and publish such ordinances as may be necessary to perfect such organization in respect to the election, duties, and compensation of officers and with respect to all other necessary matters. All ordinances of any city shall remain in force after its organization as a town so far as such ordinances may be applicable to such town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1008, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1491, § 6, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-206 as it existed prior to 1975.